Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2022
Retirement system; funds; investment; charges; report.

Any funds of the Nebraska State Patrol Retirement System available for investment shall be invested by the Nebraska Investment Council pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Payment for investment services by the council shall be charged directly against the gross investment returns of the funds. Charges so incurred shall not be a part of the board's annual budget request. The amounts of payment for such services, as of December 31 of each year, shall be reported not later than March 31 of the following year to the council, the board, and the Nebraska Retirement Systems Committee of the Legislature. The report submitted to the committee shall be submitted electronically.

The state investment officer shall sell any securities upon request from the executive director so as to provide money for the payment of benefits or annuities.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 9, p. 689;

Laws 1967, c. 486, § 40, p. 1530;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 59, p. 2382;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-449;

Laws 1986, LB 311, § 24;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 54;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 128;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 211;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 41.
July 18, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.